District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-423

Authority to contract for payments.

Repealed.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-20, § 4, 24 DCR 3339
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(g), 48 DCR 334
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 12(c), 51 DCR 881

History

1981 Ed., § 47-423.
1973 Ed., § 47-333.

Prior Codifications